sk-SK: Klasifikácia pevnosti: Extra silné; Ľahké; Bežné; Silné; Ultra silné; Iné
de: Stärkenklassifikation: Extra stark; Leicht; Normal; Stark; Ultra stark; Andere
nb: Styrkeklassifisering: Ekstra sterk; Lett; Vanlig; Sterk; Ultrasterk; Annet
fi: Lujuusluokitus: Erittäin vahva; Kevyt; Normaali; Vahva; Ultravahva; Muu
cs: Pevnostní klasifikace: Extra silné; Slabé; Běžné; Silné; Ultra silné; Jiné
zh-CN: 浓度等级: 超强; 轻量; 标准; 强; 极强; 其他
hr-HR: Klasifikacija čvrstoće: Iznimno jako; Lagano; Normalno; Jako; Ultra jako; Ostalo
th: การจำแนกระดับความแข็งแกร่ง: แข็งแรงพิเศษ; เบา; มาตรฐาน; แข็งแรง; แข็งแรงมากพิเศษ; อื่นๆ
pl: Klasyfikacja wytrzymałości: Bardzo mocny; Słaby; Zwykły; Mocny; Ultramocny; Inne
sl-SI: Klasifikacija trdnosti: Izjemno močno; Lahko; Običajno; Močno; Ultra močno; Drugo
lt-LT: Stiprumo klasifikacija: Ypač stiprus; Lengvas; Standartinis; Stiprus; Itin stiprus; Kita
vi: Phân loại độ bền: Cực mạnh; Nhẹ; Thông thường; Mạnh; Siêu mạnh; Khác
es: Clasificación de fuerza: Extra fuerte; Ligero; Normal; Fuerte; Ultra fuerte; Otro
da: Styrkeklassificering: Ekstra stærk; Let; Almindelig; Stærk; Ultrastærk; Andet
ro-RO: Clasificare a rezistenței: Extra puternic; Ușor; Normal; Puternic; Ultra puternic; Altele
nl: Sterkteclassificatie: Extra sterk; Licht; Regulier; Sterk; Ultra-sterk; Overig
it: Classificazione della resistenza: Extra forte; Leggero; Regolare; Forte; Ultra forte; Altro
zh-TW: 強度等級: 特強; 輕; 一般; 強; 超強; 其他
pt-BR: Classificação da tensão: Extra forte; Leve; Regular; Forte; Ultra forte; Outro
tr: Dayanım sınıflandırması: Ekstra sert; Hafif; Normal; Sert; Ultra sert; Diğer
hu: Erősség besorolása: Extra erős; Könnyű; Normál; Erős; Ultra erős; Egyéb
el: Κατάταξη ισχύος: Πολύ δυνατό; Ελαφρύ; Κανονικό; Δυνατό; Εξαιρετικά δυνατό; Άλλο
bg-BG: Класификация на здравината: Изключително силно; Леко; Стандартно; Силно; Ултра силно; Друго
ru: Классификация прочности: Экстрасильная; Легкая; Стандартная; Сильная; Ультрасильная; Другое
sv: Beslag för remfäste: Extra stark; Lätt; Normal; Stark; Ultrastark; Övrigt
pt-PT: Classificação da intensidade: Extra forte; Leve; Normal; Forte; Ultra forte; Outro
ja: 強度分類: エクストラストロング; ライト; レギュラー; ストロング; ウルトラストロング; その他
ko: 강도 분류: 매유 강함; 약함; 보통; 강함; 최고 강함; 기타
en: Strength classification: Extra strong; Light; Regular; Strong; Ultra strong; Other
fr: Classification selon la résistance: Extra fort; Léger; Régulier; Fort; Ultra fort; Autre